North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 1. Workers’ Compensation Act.
§ 97-54.
“Disablement” defined.

The term “disablement” as used in this Article as applied to cases of asbestosis and silicosis means the event of becoming actually incapacitated because of asbestosis or silicosis to earn, in the same or any other employment, the wages which the employee was receiving at the time of his last injurious exposure to asbestosis or silicosis; but in all other cases of occupational disease “disablement” shall be equivalent to “disability” as defined in

G.S. 97-2(9)

.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1955, c. 525, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For discussion of occupational disease compensation in light of Rutledge v. Tultex Corp./Kings Yarn,

308 N.C. 85

, 301 S.E.2d 370 (1983), see 62 N.C.L. Rev. 573 (1984).

§ 97-55.
“Disability” defined.

The term “disability” as used in this Article means the state of being incapacitated as the term is used in defining “disablement” in

G.S. 97-54

.

History.

1935, c. 123.

Legal Periodicals.

For discussion of occupational disease compensation in light of Rutledge v. Tultex Corp./Kings Yarn,

308 N.C. 85

, 301 S.E.2d 370 (1983), see 62 N.C.L. Rev. 573 (1984).

§ 97-56.
Limitation on compensable diseases.

The provisions of this Article shall apply only to cases of occupational disease in which the last exposure in an occupation subject to the hazards of such diseases occurred on or after March 26, 1935.

History.

1935, c. 123.

§ 97-57.
Employer liable.

In any case where compensation is payable for an occupational disease, the employer in whose employment the employee was last injuriously exposed to the hazards of such disease, and the insurance carrier, if any, which was on the risk when the employee was so last exposed under such employer, shall be liable.

For the purpose of this section when an employee has been exposed to the hazards of asbestosis or silicosis for as much as 30 working days, or parts thereof, within seven consecutive calendar months, such exposure shall be deemed injurious but any less exposure shall not be deemed injurious; provided, however, that in the event an insurance carrier has been on the risk for a period of time during which an employee has been injuriously exposed to the hazards of asbestosis or silicosis, and if after insurance carrier goes off the risk said employee is further exposed to the hazards of asbestosis or silicosis, although not so exposed for a period of 30 days or parts thereof so as to constitute a further injurious exposure, such carrier shall, nevertheless, be liable.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1957, c. 1396, s. 7.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1982 law on workers’ compensation, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1243 (1983).

For note, “Caulder v. Waverly Mills: Expanding the Definition of an Occupational Disease Under the Last Injurious Exposure Rule,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1566 (1986).

§ 97-58.
Time limit for filing claims.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 729, s. 13.

The report and notice to the employer as required by

G.S. 97-22

shall apply in all cases of occupational disease except in case of asbestosis, silicosis, or lead poisoning. The time of notice of an occupational disease shall run from the date that the employee has been advised by competent medical authority that he has same.

The right to compensation for occupational disease shall be barred unless a claim be filed with the Industrial Commission within two years after death, disability, or disablement as the case may be. Provided, however, that the right to compensation for radiation injury, disability or death shall be barred unless a claim is filed within two years after the date upon which the employee first suffered incapacity from the exposure to radiation and either knew or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should have known that the occupational disease was caused by his present or prior employment.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1955, c. 525, s. 6; 1963, c. 553, s. 2; 1973, c. 1060, s. 3; 1981, c. 734, s. 1; 1987, c. 729, s. 13.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

For survey of 1981 administrative law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1165 (1982).

For note, “Wilder v. Amatex Corp.: A First Step Toward Ameliorating the Effect of Statutes of Repose on Plaintiffs with Delayed Manifestation Diseases,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 416 (1986).

For note, “Caulder v. Waverly Mills: Expanding the Definition of an Occupational Disease Under the Last Injurious Exposure Rule,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1566 (1986).

§ 97-59.
Employer to pay for treatment.

Medical compensation shall be paid by the employer in cases in which awards are made for disability or damage to organs as a result of an occupational disease after bills for same have been approved by the Industrial Commission.

In case of a controversy arising between the employer and employee relative to the continuance of medical, surgical, hospital or other treatment, the Industrial Commission may order such further treatments as may in the discretion of the Commission be necessary.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1973, c. 1061; 1981, c. 339; 1991, c. 703, s. 5.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1981 administrative law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1165 (1982).

For survey of 1982 law on workers’ compensation, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1243 (1983).

§ 97-60.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 10.33(a), effective July 1, 2003.

§ 97-61.
[Repealed]

Rewritten as §§ 97-61.1 to 97-61.7.

§ 97-61.1.
First examination of and report on employee having asbestosis or silicosis.

When the Industrial Commission is advised by an employer or employee that an employee has or allegedly has asbestosis or silicosis, the employee, when ordered by the Industrial Commission, shall submit to X rays and a physical examination by the advisory medical committee or other designated qualified physician who is not a member of the advisory medical committee. The employer shall pay the expenses connected with the examination by the advisory medical committee or other designated qualified physician who is not a member of the advisory medical committee in such amounts as shall be directed by the Industrial Commission. Within 30 days after the completion of the examination, the advisory medical committee or other designated qualified physician shall submit a written report to the Industrial Commission setting forth:

The X rays and clinical procedures used.

Whether or not the claimant has contracted asbestosis or silicosis.

The advisory medical committee’s or designated qualified physician’s opinion expressed in percentages of the impairment of the employee’s ability to perform normal labor in the same or any other employment.

Any other matter deemed pertinent.

When a competent physician certifies to the Industrial Commission that the employee’s physical condition is such that his movement to the place of examination ordered by the Industrial Commission as herein provided in

G.S. 97-61.1

, 97-61.3 and 97-61.4 would be harmful or injurious to the health of the employee, the Industrial Commission shall cause the examination of the employee to be made by the advisory medical committee or other designated qualified physician as herein provided at some place in the vicinity of the residence of the employee suitable for the purposes of making such examination.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1955, c. 525, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(15); 1997-443, s. 11A.37; 2003-284, s. 10.33(b).

Cross References.

See Editor’s note under

G.S. 97-61

.

§ 97-61.2.
Filing of first report; right of hearing; effect of report as testimony.

The advisory medical committee shall file its report in triplicate with the Industrial Commission, which shall send one copy thereof to the claimant and one copy thereof to the employer by registered mail or certified mail. Unless within 30 days from receipt of the copy of said report the claimant and employer, or either of them, shall request the Industrial Commission in writing to set the case for hearing for the purpose of examining and cross-examining the members of the advisory medical committee respecting the report of said committee, and for the purpose of introducing additional testimony, said report shall become a part of the record of the case and shall be accepted by the Industrial Commission as expert medical testimony to be considered as such and in connection with all the evidence in the case in arriving at its decision.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1955, c. 525, s. 2; 1963, c. 450, s. 5.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note under

G.S. 97-61

.

§ 97-61.3.
Second examination and report.

As soon as practicable after the expiration of one year following the initial examination by the advisory medical committee and when ordered by the Industrial Commission, the employee shall again appear before the advisory medical committee, at least one of whom shall conduct the examination, and the member or members of the advisory medical committee conducting the examination shall forward the X rays and findings to the member or members of the committee not present for the physical examination. Within 30 days after the completion of the examination, the advisory medical committee shall make a written report to the Industrial Commission signed by all of its members, setting forth any change since the first report in the employee’s condition which is due to asbestosis or silicosis, said report to be filed in triplicate with the Industrial Commission, which shall send one copy thereof to the claimant, and one copy to the employer by registered mail or certified mail. The claimant and employer, or either of them, shall have the right only at the final hearing provided for in

G.S. 97-61.4

to examine or cross-examine the members of the advisory medical committee respecting the second report of the committee.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1955, c. 525, s. 2; 1959, c. 863, s. 2.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note under

G.S. 97-61

.

§ 97-61.4.
Third examination and report.

As soon as practicable after the expiration of two years from the first examination and when ordered by the Industrial Commission, the employee shall appear before the advisory medical committee, or at least two of them, for final X rays and physical examination. Upon completion of this examination and within 30 days, the advisory medical committee shall make a written report setting forth:

The X rays and clinical procedures used by the committee.

To what extent, if any, has the damage to the employee’s lungs due to asbestosis or silicosis changed since the first examination.

The opinion of the committee, expressed in percentages, with respect to the extent of impairment of the employee’s ability to earn in the same or any other employment the wages which the employee was receiving at the time of his last injurious exposure to asbestosis or silicosis.

Any other matter deemed pertinent by the committee.

Said report shall be filed in triplicate with the Industrial Commission which shall send one copy thereof to the claimant and one copy to the employer by registered mail or certified mail.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1955, c. 525, s. 2; 1959, c. 863, s. 3.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note under

G.S. 97-61

.

§ 97-61.5.
Hearing after first examination and report; removal of employee from hazardous occupation; compensation upon removal from hazardous occupation.

After the employer and employee have received notice of the first committee report, the Industrial Commission, unless it has already approved an agreement between the employer and employee, shall set the matter for hearing at a time and place to be decided by it, to hear any controverted questions, determine if and to whom liability attaches, and where appropriate, file a written opinion with its findings of fact and conclusions of law and cause its award to be issued thereon, all of which shall be subject to modification as provided in

G.S. 97-61.6

.

If the Industrial Commission finds at the first hearing that the employee has either asbestosis or silicosis or if the parties enter into an agreement to the effect that the employee has silicosis or asbestosis, it shall by order remove the employee from any occupation which exposes him to the hazards of asbestosis or silicosis, and if the employee thereafter engages in any occupation which exposes him to the hazards of asbestosis or silicosis without having obtained the written approval of the Industrial Commission as provided in

G.S. 97-61.7

, neither he, his dependents, personal representative nor any other person shall be entitled to any compensation for disablement or death resulting from asbestosis or silicosis; provided, that if the employee is removed from the industry the employer shall pay or cause to be paid as in this subsection provided to the employee affected by such asbestosis or silicosis a weekly compensation equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of his average weekly wages before removal from the industry, but not more than the amount established annually to be effective October 1 as provided in

G.S. 97-29

or less than thirty dollars ($30.00) a week, which compensation shall continue for a period of 104 weeks. Payments made under this subsection shall be credited on the amounts payable under any final award in the cause entered under

G.S. 97-61.6

.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1955, c. 525, s. 2; c. 1354; 1957, c. 1217; c. 1396, s. 8; 1963, c. 604, s. 6; 1967, c. 84, s. 7; 1969, c. 143, s. 6; 1971, c. 281, s. 5; 1973, c. 515, s. 6; c. 759, s. 5; 1981, c. 276, s. 1; c. 378, s. 1.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note under

G.S. 97-61

.

§ 97-61.6.
Hearing after third examination and report; compensation for disability and death from asbestosis or silicosis.

After receipt by the employer and employee of the advisory medical committee’s third report, the Industrial Commission, unless it has approved an agreement between the employee and employer, shall set a final hearing in the cause, at which it shall receive all competent evidence bearing on the cause, and shall make a final disposition of the case, determining what compensation, if any, the employee is entitled to receive in addition to the 104 weeks already received.

Where the incapacity for work resulting from asbestosis or silicosis is found to be total, the employer shall pay, or cause to be paid, to the injured employee during such total disability a weekly compensation in accordance with

G.S. 97-29

.

When the incapacity for work resulting from asbestosis or silicosis is partial, the employer shall pay, or cause to be paid, to the affected employee, a weekly compensation equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the difference between his average weekly wages at the time of his last injurious exposure, and the average weekly wages which he is able to earn thereafter, but not more than the amount established annually to be effective October 1 as provided in

G.S. 97-29

, a week, and provided that the total compensation so paid shall not exceed a period of 196 weeks, in addition to the 104 weeks for which the employee has already been compensated.

Provided, however, should death result from asbestosis or silicosis within two years from the date of last exposure, or should death result from asbestosis or silicosis, or from a secondary infection or diseases developing from asbestosis or silicosis within 350 weeks from the date of last exposure and while the employee is entitled to compensation for disablement due to asbestosis or silicosis, either partial or total, then in either of these events, the employer shall pay, or cause to be paid compensation in accordance with

G.S. 97-38

.

Provided further that if the employee has asbestosis or silicosis and dies from any other cause, the employer shall pay, or cause to be paid by one of the methods set forth in

G.S. 97-38

compensation for any remaining portion of the 104 weeks specified in

G.S. 97-61.5

for which the employee has not previously been paid compensation, and in addition shall pay compensation for such number of weeks as the percentage of disability of the employee bears to 196 weeks. If the employee was totally disabled as a result of asbestosis or silicosis, compensation shall be paid for any remaining portion of the 104 weeks specified in

G.S. 97-61.5

for which the employee has not previously been paid compensation, and in addition shall be paid for an additional 300 weeks.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1955, c. 525, s. 2; c. 1354; 1957, c. 1271; 1963, c. 604, s. 7; 1965, c. 907; 1967, c. 84, s. 8; 1969, c. 143, s. 7; 1971, c. 281, s. 6; c. 631; 1973, c. 515, s. 7; c. 759, s. 6; c. 1308, ss. 6, 7; 1979, c. 246; 1981, c. 276, s. 1.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note under

G.S. 97-61

.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on administrative evidence rules, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 635 (1971).

§ 97-61.7.
Waiver of right to compensation as alternative to forced change of occupation.

An employee who has been compensated under the terms of

G.S. 97-61.5(b)

as an alternative to forced change of occupation, may, subject to the approval of the Industrial Commission, waive in writing his right to further compensation for any aggravation of his condition that may result from his continuing in an occupation exposing him to the hazards of asbestosis or silicosis, in which case payment of all compensation awarded previous to the date of the waiver as approved by the Industrial Commission shall bar any further claims by the employee, or anyone claiming through him, provided, that in the event of total disablement or death as a result of asbestosis or silicosis with which the employee was so affected, compensation shall nevertheless be payable, but in no case, whether for disability or death or both, for a longer period than 100 weeks in addition to the 104 weeks already paid. Such written waiver must be filed with the Industrial Commission, and the Commission shall keep a record of each waiver, which record shall be open to the inspection of any interested person.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1955, c. 525, s. 2.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note under

G.S. 97-61

.

§ 97-62.
“Silicosis” and “asbestosis” defined.

The word “silicosis” shall mean the characteristic fibrotic condition of the lungs caused by the inhalation of dust of silica or silicates. “Asbestosis” shall mean a characteristic fibrotic condition of the lungs caused by the inhalation of asbestos dust.

History.

1935, c. 123.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Caulder v. Waverly Mills: Expanding the Definition of an Occupational Disease under the Last Injurious Exposure Rule,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1566 (1986).

§ 97-63.
Period necessary for employee to be exposed.

Compensation shall not be payable for disability or death due to silicosis and/or asbestosis unless the employee shall have been exposed to the inhalation of dust of silica or silicates or asbestos dust in employment for a period of not less than two years in this State, provided no part of such period of two years shall have been more than 10 years prior to the last exposure.

History.

1935, c. 123.

§ 97-64.
General provisions of act to control as regards benefits.

Except as herein otherwise provided, in case of disablement or death from silicosis and/or asbestosis, compensation shall be payable in accordance with the provisions of the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1979, c. 714, s. 2.

§ 97-65.
Reduction of rate where tuberculosis develops.

In case of disablement or death due primarily from silicosis and/or asbestosis and complicated with tuberculosis of the lungs compensation shall be payable as hereinbefore provided, except that the rate of payments may be reduced one sixth.

History.

1935, c. 123.

§ 97-66.
Claim where benefits are discontinued.

Where compensation payments have been made and discontinued, and further compensation is claimed, the claim for further compensation shall be made within two years after the last payment in all cases of occupational disease, provided, that claims for further compensation for asbestosis or silicosis shall be governed by the final award as set forth in

G.S. 97-61.6

.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1945, c. 762; 1955, c. 525, s. 3; 1987, c. 729, s. 14.

§ 97-67.
Postmortem examinations; notice to next of kin and insurance carrier.

Upon the filing of a claim for death from an occupational disease where in the opinion of the Industrial Commission a postmortem examination is necessary to accurately ascertain the cause of death, such examination shall be ordered by the Industrial Commission. A full report of such examination shall be certified to the Industrial Commission. The surviving spouse or next kin and the employer or his insurance carrier, if their identity and whereabouts can be reasonably ascertained, shall be given reasonable notice of the time and place of such postmortem examination, and, if present at such examination, shall be given an opportunity to witness the same. Any such person may be present at and witness such examination either in person or through a duly authorized representative. If such examination is not consented to by the surviving husband or wife or next of kin, all right to compensation shall cease.

History.

1935, c. 123.

§ 97-68.
Controverted medical questions.

The Industrial Commission may at its discretion refer to the advisory medical committee controverted medical questions arising out of occupational disease claims other than asbestosis or silicosis.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1955, c. 525, s. 4.

§ 97-69.
Examination by advisory medical committee; inspection of medical reports.

The advisory medical committee, upon reference to it of a case of occupational disease shall notify the employee, or, in case he is dead, his dependents or personal representative, and his employer to appear before the advisory medical committee at a time and place stated in the notice. If the employee be living, he shall appear before the advisory medical committee at the time and place specified then or thereafter and he shall submit to such examinations including clinical and X-ray examinations as the advisory medical committee may require. The employee, or, if he be dead, the claimant and the employer shall be entitled to have present at all such examinations, a physician admitted to practice medicine in the State who shall be given every reasonable facility for observing every such examination whose services shall be paid for by the claimant or by the employer who engaged his services. If a physician admitted to practice medicine in the State shall certify that the employee is physically unable to appear at the time and place designated by the advisory medical committee, such committee may, upon the advice of the Industrial Commission, and on notice to the employer, change the place and/or time of the examination so as to reasonably facilitate the examination of the employee, and in any such case the employer shall furnish transportation and provide for other reasonably necessary expenses incidental to necessary travel. The claimant and the employer shall produce to the advisory medical committee all reports of medical and X-ray examinations which may be in their respective possession or control showing the past or present condition of the employee to assist the advisory medical committee in reaching its conclusions. Provided that this section shall not apply to a living employee who has contracted asbestosis or silicosis.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1955, c. 525, s. 5.

§ 97-70.
Report of committee to Industrial Commission.

The advisory medical committee, shall, as soon as practicable after it has completed its consideration of a case, report to the Industrial Commission its opinion regarding all medical questions involved in the case. The advisory medical committee shall include in its report a statement of what, if any, physician or physicians were present at the examination on behalf of the claimant or employer and what, if any, medical reports and X rays were produced by or on behalf of the claimant or employer.

History.

1935, c. 123.

§ 97-71.
Filing report; right of hearing on report.

The advisory medical committee shall file its report in triplicate with the Industrial Commission, which shall send one copy thereof to the claimant and one copy to the employer by registered mail. Unless within 30 days from receipt of the copy of said report the claimant and/or employer shall request the Industrial Commission in writing to set the case for further hearing for the purpose of examining and/or cross-examining the members of the advisory medical committee respecting the report of said committee, said report shall become a part of the record of the case and shall be accepted by the Industrial Commission as expert medical testimony to be considered as such in connection with all the evidence in the case in arriving at its decision.

History.

1935, c. 123.

§ 97-72.
Appointment of advisory medical committee; terms of office; duties and functions; salaries and expenses.

There shall be an advisory medical committee consisting of three members, who shall be licensed physicians in good professional standing and peculiarly qualified in the diagnosis or treatment of occupational diseases. They shall be appointed by the Industrial Commission with the approval of the Governor, and one of them shall be designated as chairman of the committee by the Industrial Commission. The members of committee shall be appointed to serve terms as follows: one for a term of two years, one for a term of four years, and one for a term of six years. Upon the expiration of each term as above mentioned the Industrial Commission shall appoint a successor for a term of six years. The function of the committee shall be to conduct examinations and make reports as required by

G.S. 97-61.1

through 97-61.6 and 97-68 through 97-71, and to assist in any postmortem examinations provided for in

G.S. 97-67

when so directed by the Industrial Commission. Members of the committee shall devote to the duties of the office so much of their time as may be required in the conducting of examinations with reasonable promptness, and they shall attend hearings as scheduled by the Industrial Commission when their attendance is desired for the purpose of examining and cross-examining them respecting any report or reports made by them.

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 10.33(c), effective July 1, 2003.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the Industrial Commission, in its discretion, may designate a qualified physician who is not a member of the advisory medical committee to perform an examination of an employee who has filed a claim for benefits for asbestosis or silicosis. This physician shall file his reports in the same manner a member of the advisory medical committee files reports; and these reports shall be deemed reports of the advisory medical committee.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1955, c. 525, s. 7; 1981, c. 562, s. 2; 1989, c. 439; 1991, c. 481, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.38; 1997-508, s. 1; 2003-284, s. 10.33(c).

§ 97-73.
Fees.

Claims. — Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the Industrial Commission may establish by rule a schedule of fees for examinations conducted, reports made, documents filed, and agreements reviewed under this Article. The fees shall be collected in accordance with rules adopted by the Industrial Commission.

, (c) Repealed by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 10.33(d), effective July 1, 2003.

(d)

Safety. —

A fee in the amount set by the Industrial Commission is imposed on an employer for whom the Industrial Commission provides an educational training program on how to prevent or reduce accidents or injuries that result in workers’ compensation claims or a person for whom the Industrial Commission provides other educational services. The fees are departmental receipts.

(e)

Exceptions. —

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Industrial Commission may not charge fees for any of the following:

A hearing before a Deputy Commissioner under this Chapter.

A hearing before the full Commission under this Chapter.

Processing of an agreement for compensation of disability, an employer’s admission of employee’s right to permanent partial disability, or a supplemental agreement as to payment of compensation.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1955, c. 525, s. 8; 1991, c. 481, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1039, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.39; 2003-284, s. 10.33(d); 2005-276, s. 45.1(a); 2009-451, s. 14.16(a); 2014-100, s. 15.16B(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 45.1(a), effective August 13, 2005, rewrote the section heading and subsection (a).

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 14.16(a), effective July, 1, 2009, added the subsection heading in subsection (a), and added subsection (d).

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 15.16B(a), effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), substituted “Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the Industrial” for “The Industrial”; and added subsection (e).

§ 97-74.
Expense of hearings taxed as costs in compensation cases; fees collected directed to general fund.

In hearings arising out of claims for disability and/or death resulting from occupational diseases the Industrial Commission shall tax as a part of the costs in cases in which compensation is awarded a reasonable allowance for the services of members of the advisory medical committee attending such hearings and reasonable allowances for the services of members of the advisory medical committee for making investigations in connection with all claims for compensation on account of occupational diseases, including uncontested cases, as well as contested cases, and whether or not hearings shall have been conducted in connection therewith. All such charges, fees and allowances to be collected by the Industrial Commission shall be paid into the general fund of the State treasury to constitute a fund out of which to pay the expenses of the advisory medical committee.

History.

1935, c. 123.

§§ 97-75,
97-76.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 10.33(f), effective July 1, 2003.

§ 97-77.
North Carolina Industrial Commission created; members appointed by Governor; terms of office; chairman.

There is hereby created a commission to be known as the North Carolina Industrial Commission, consisting of six commissioners who shall devote their entire time to the duties of the Commission. The Governor shall appoint the members of the Commission for terms of six years. Three commissioners shall be persons who, on account of their previous vocations, employment or affiliations, can be classed as representatives of employers. Three commissioners shall be persons who, on account of their previous vocations, employment or affiliations, can be classed as representatives of employees. No person may serve more than two terms on the Commission, including any term served prior to the effective date of this section. In calculating the number of terms served, a partial term that is less than three years in length shall not be included.

(a1)

Appointments of commissioners are subject to confirmation by the General Assembly by joint resolution. The names of commissioners to be appointed by the Governor shall be submitted by the Governor to the General Assembly for confirmation by the General Assembly on or before March 1 of the year of expiration of the term. If the Governor fails to timely submit nominations, the General Assembly shall appoint to fill the succeeding term upon the joint recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

not inconsistent with this section.In case of death, incapacity, resignation, or any other vacancy in the office of any commissioner prior to the expiration of the term of office, a nomination to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term shall be submitted by the Governor within four weeks after the vacancy arises to the General Assembly for confirmation by the General Assembly. If the Governor fails to timely nominate a person to fill the vacancy, the General Assembly shall appoint a person to fill the remainder of the unexpired term upon the joint recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

not inconsistent with this section. If a vacancy arises or exists pursuant to this subsection when the General Assembly is not in session, and the appointment is deemed urgent by the Governor, the commissioner may be appointed and serve on an interim basis pending confirmation by the General Assembly; provided, however, no person may be appointed to serve on an interim basis pending confirmation by the General Assembly if the person was subject to but not confirmed by the General Assembly within the preceding four years. The limitation on appointment contained in this subsection includes, among other things, unfavorable action on a joint resolution for confirmation, such as the resolution failing on any reading in either chamber of the General Assembly, and failure to ratify a joint resolution for confirmation prior to adjournment of the then current session of the General Assembly. For the purpose of this subsection, the General Assembly is not in session only (i) prior to convening of the Regular Session, (ii) during any adjournment of the Regular Session for more than 10 days, and (iii) after sine die adjournment of the Regular Session.No person while in office as a commissioner may be nominated or appointed on an interim basis to fill the remainder of an unexpired term, or to a full term that commences prior to the expiration of the term that the commissioner is serving.

One member, to be designated by the Governor, shall act as chairman.The chairman shall be the chief judicial officer and the chief executive officer of the Industrial Commission; such authority shall be exercised pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes and the rules and policies of the State Human Resources Commission. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Chapter, the chairman shall have such authority as is necessary to direct and oversee the Commission. The chairman may delegate any duties and responsibilities as may be necessary to ensure the proper management of the Industrial Commission. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Chapter, Chapter 143A, and Chapter 143B of the General Statutes, the chairman may hire or fire personnel and transfer personnel within the Industrial Commission.The Governor may designate one vice-chairman from the remaining commissioners.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 51; 1931, c. 274, s. 8; 1991, c. 264, s. 1; 1993, c. 399, s. 3; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 28.15(a); 2011-287, ss. 16, 17; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 24(a), (b); 2018-114, s. 23(b); 2019-167, s. 2.

Cross References.

For provision constituting Industrial Commission a court to hear and determine tort claims, see

G.S. 143-291

.

§ 97-77.1.
Expired.